Hawaii statutes.
§206E-182 Powers. In addition and
supplemental to the powers granted to the authority by law, the authority may:

(1) With the approval of the governor, enter into a
special facility lease or an amendment or supplement thereto whereby the
authority agrees to construct, acquire, or remodel and furnish or equip a
special facility solely for the use by another person to a special facility
lease;

(2) With the approval of the governor, issue special
facility revenue bonds in principal amounts not to exceed the total amount of
bonds authorized by the legislature, that may be necessary to yield all or a
portion of the cost of any construction, acquisition, remodeling, furnishing,
and equipping of any special facility;

(3) With the approval of the governor, issue
refunding special facility revenue bonds, in principal amounts not to exceed
the total amount of bonds authorized by the legislature, with which to provide
for the payment of outstanding special facility revenue bonds (including any
special facility revenue bonds theretofore issued for this purpose) or any part
thereof; provided any issuance of refunding special facility revenue bonds
shall not reduce the principal amount of the bonds which may be issued as
provided in paragraph (2);

(4) Perform and carry out the terms and provisions of
any special facility lease;

(5) Notwithstanding section 103-7 or any other law to
the contrary, acquire, construct, or remodel and furnish or equip any special
facility, or accept the assignment of any contract therefor entered into by the
other person to the special facility lease;

(6) Construct any special facility on land owned by
the State; provided that no funds derived herein will be expended for land
acquisition; and

(7) Agree with the other person to the special
facility lease whereby any acquisition, construction, remodeling, furnishing,
or equipping of the special facility and the expenditure of moneys therefor
shall be undertaken or supervised by another person. [L 2001, c 180, pt of §2;
am L 2004, c 216, §26; am L 2014, c 61, §11]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next